South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3214.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A)  The State Board of Education, in conjunction with the Food Systems and Safety Program of the Clemson University Cooperative Extension Service (Clemson Extension Service), shall plan, develop, institute, and oversee a pilot program of three public school-based community canning sites where members of the general public may bring locally-grown produce to be canned for their personal use. The purpose of this program is to enable families to safely preserve and store food grown by them for personal consumption through the use of: (1)   research-based information, procedures, and instruction concerning canning food; and (2)   industrial grade equipment and related supplies that allow faster processing of fruits and vegetables on a larger scale than can be done at home. (B)  The State Board of Education and Clemson Extension Service shall cause the public school-based community canneries to be pilot tested in three selected school districts from 2026 through 2029, and shall provide community training programs for food preservation using canning. Use of the canning facilities and canning supplies must be provided to the community with limits on the amount available for each family as determined appropriate by the State Board of Education and Clemson Extension Service. Community members wishing to use the facilities must be required to sign an agreement stating that they will not sell any of the food that they can at the cannery. Each cannery must maintain schedules of times at which the canning facilities are available to the public and also shall maintain records related to the use of the facilities as the State Board of Education and the Clemson Extension Service considers appropriate. (C)  Before January 1, 2029, the State Board of Education and Clemson Extension Service shall report on the performance of each cannery and make recommendations regarding whether the program should be continued and expanded through the permanent enactment of legislation for that purpose. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor and is subject to funding by the General Assembly. ----XX----